Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 1 General Provisions as to Civil Actions
§§ 1-1-110 through 1-1-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 24, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to liability of each defendant for proportional amount of damages, see §

1-1-109

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 67, § 1 and Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1, related to contributions among joint tortfeasors, and releases or covenants not to sue.

§ 1-1-114.
Pleading
of damages.

In all cases the court
shall inform the jury of the consequences of its verdict.

History.

Laws 1976, ch. 10, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-7.7; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 101.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted the former first and second sentences which related to dollar amounts for damages.

The former first two sentences of this section are unconstitutional

in that they prescribe the content of pleadings, a procedural function, thereby infringing upon the constitutional and inherent power of the supreme court to make rules. White v. Fisher, 689 P.2d 102,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1984) (decided under prior law).

Wyoming legislature intended for provisions of this section to apply to incidents occurring only on or after May 28, 1976,

its effective date. Johnson v. Safeway Stores, 568 P.2d 908,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1977) (decided under prior law).

Mere reading of language in this section evinces clear and definite meaning.

Johnson v. Safeway Stores, 568 P.2d 908,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1977) (decided under prior law); Buttrey Food Stores Div. v. Coulson, 620 P.2d 549,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 323

(Wyo. 1980) (decided under prior law).

Use of phrase, “In all cases,”

in this section, permitting advice to the jury concerning the effect of the percentage findings in its verdict under the comparative negligence statute, conveys a clear and commonly understood meaning which can be applied in a fashion consistent with the other provisions of the statute. The phrase relates to a class of civil actions which are characterized as personal injury or wrongful death and refers without exception to all cases which fall into this class. Johnson v. Safeway Stores, 568 P.2d 908,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1977) (decided under prior law).

The legislature, by its enactment of this section, manifested a clear intendment for its provisions to apply without exception to all personal injury actions, including those cases brought by “any person or his legal representative to recover damages for negligence resulting in death or in injury to person or property.” Johnson v. Safeway Stores, 568 P.2d 908,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1977) (decided under prior law).

There is enough conflict
between this section and §

1-1-109

that the two cannot stand together.

Johnson v. Safeway Stores, 568 P.2d 908,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1977) (decided under prior law).

Thus §

1-1-109

is amended. —

The Wyoming legislature, in enacting this section, clearly intended for its provisions to apply to comparative negligence actions and amended §

1-1-109

to the extent that in such actions the jury shall be informed by the trial court on the effect of its percentage findings, as those findings affect the outcome of the case, and particularly the damage issue. Johnson v. Safeway Stores, 568 P.2d 908,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1977) (decided under prior law).

Quoted

in

Woodward v. Haney, 564 P.2d 844,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1977).

Cited

in

Haderlie v. Sondgeroth, 866 P.2d 703,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Comparative Negligence and Strict Tort Liability — A Marriage of Necessity,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1983).

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

For article, “Comparative Negligence and Strict Tort Liability — The Marriage Revisited,” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of anticipated inflation on damages for future losses — modern cases, 21 ALR4th 21.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for noneconomic loss caused by personal injury or death of parent, 61 ALR4th 251.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for noneconomic loss caused by personal injury or death of spouse, 61 ALR4th 309.

Plaintiff's rights to punitive or multiple damages when cause of action renders both available, 2 ALR5th 449.

Wrongful death damages for loss of expectancy of inheritance from decedent, 42 ALR5th 465.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for injuries to trunk or torso, or internal injuries, 48 ALR5th 129.

Valuing damages in personal injury actions awarded for gratuitously rendered nursing and medical care, 49 ALR5th 685.

§ 1-1-115.
Civil liability for unpaid checks.

Any person who issues a check which is not paid because the check has been dishonored for any reason has thirty (30) days following the date of a written demand mailed to the drawer of the check by United States postal service certificate of mailing at the address shown on the check or his last known address or personally served pursuant to the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, to pay to the holder of the check the amount of the check and a collection fee not to exceed thirty dollars ($30.00). The demand shall state that the drawer is required to pay the value of the check and the collection fee demanded and shall state the collection fee provided for in this section.

Any person who fails to pay the amount of the check and the collection fee as set forth in subsection (a) of this section within thirty (30) days following the date of a written demand, mailed to or served on the drawer in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, is liable to the holder of the check for three (3) times the amount of the check, but in no case less than one hundred dollars ($100.00), a collection fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), and court costs.

In extraordinary cases, including cases in which the court determines that the party who wrote the check has raised dilatory or bad faith defenses, the court may award the prevailing party reasonable attorney fees.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the criminal prosecution of the person who issues the check. However, any payment made by the defendant to a victim pursuant to an order for restitution entered in a criminal case pursuant to W.S.

7-9-101

through

7-9-112

or 6-3-704(b), shall be set off against any judgment in favor of the victim in a civil action brought under this section arising out of the same facts or event.

A cause of action under this section may be brought in small claims court, if the amount of the demand does not exceed the jurisdiction of that court, or in any other appropriate court.

As used in this section, “check,” “drawee,” “drawer” and “issue” have the same meaning as defined in W.S.

6-3-701

.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 28, § 1; 1985, ch. 72, § 1; 1997, ch. 201, § 1; 1999, ch. 53, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to criminal penalties for check fraud, see §

6-3-701

et seq.

Cited

in

Mt. Rushmore Broad., Inc. v. Statewide Collections, 2002 WY 39, 42 P.3d 478,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2002); Dave v. Valdez, 2012 WY 59, 275 P.3d 485,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Apr. 13, 2012).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Collecting Debt in Wyoming: The Fair Debt Collection Practices Act as a Trap for the Unwary,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 731 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of provision of Fair Debt Collection
Practices Act relating to validation of debts (15 U.S.C. § 1692g),
150 ALR Fed 101.

§ 1-1-116.
Civil liability for theft of services.

Notwithstanding any criminal penalties which may apply, an owner or operator of a franchised or otherwise duly licensed provider of services may bring a civil action to enjoin or restrain any violation of W.S.

6-3-402

when the violation involves theft of services and may in the same action seek damages from the person violating W.S.

6-3-402

.

In order to maintain an action for injunctive relief under this section, it is not necessary for the plaintiff to show actual damages or the threat of actual damages.

As used in this section, “services” has the same meaning as specified in W.S. 6-3-401(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 149, § 1; 2020 ch. 90, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “violation of W.S.

6-3-402

when the violation involves theft of services” for “violation of W.S.

6-3-408

” and “violating W.S.

6-3-402

” for “violating W.S.

6-3-408

”; and in (c) substituted “W.S. 6-3-401(a)(v)” for “W.S. 6-3-408” and made a stylistic change.

§ 1-1-117.
Affidavits of noninvolvement.

In any action, whether in tort, contract or otherwise, in which the plaintiff seeks damages, a party may, in lieu of answering or otherwise pleading, file an affidavit certifying that he was not directly or indirectly involved in the occurrence or occurrences alleged in the action. If an affidavit is filed, the court shall order the dismissal of the claim against the certifying party, except as provided for in subsection (b) of this section. The affidavit shall be filed within the time required for filing an answer, if no answer is filed; and, in any event, at least twenty (20) days prior to trial. Any order of dismissal based on the affidavit shall not be entered within ten (10) days after the affidavit is filed.

Any party may oppose the dismissal or move to vacate the order of dismissal and reinstate the certifying party, provided he can show that the certifying party was directly or indirectly involved in the occurrence or occurrences alleged in the action. After the filing of an affidavit under this section, the party opposing the dismissal may have discovery with respect to the involvement or noninvolvement of the party filing the affidavit, provided the discovery is completed within sixty (60) days of the filing of the affidavit.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 5, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1986, ch. 48, § 1, also enacted a §

1-1-117

. See §

1-1-118

and notes thereto.

Dismissal. —

When plaintiff was rear-ended by a drunk, eighteen-year-old driver, she recovered compensatory damages in an action against the driver and was made whole; thus, her second suit against the driver's parents and uncle was barred. The district court properly granted defendants'
motion for summary judgment and dismissed the uncle from the case after he filed an affidavit of non-involvement under this section.
Fuentes v. Jednat, 2010 WY 40, 229 P.3d 949,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2010).

Applied

in

Chasson v. Community Action of Laramie County, Inc., 768 P.2d 572,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 1-1-118.
Amateur rodeos; liability for injuries; consent to participate.

No public school or nonprofit organization sponsoring an amateur rodeo is liable for injuries suffered by a contestant as a result of his voluntary participation in a rodeo event except for injuries caused by the willful, wanton or reckless act of the sponsoring organization or its employees.

A minor shall be deemed to be a voluntary participant for purposes of this section if he has signed a written consent to participate in the rodeo event and the consent is also signed by one (1) of the minor’s parents or by his legal guardian.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 48, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-1-117

.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1986, ch. 48, § 1, enacted this section as §

1-1-117

, but since a previous act (Laws 1986, ch. 5, § 1) had already enacted a §

1-1-117

, this section has been redesignated as §

1-1-118

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and effect of provision releasing school from liability for injuries to students caused by interscholastic and other extracurricular activities, 85 ALR4th 344.

§ 1-1-119.
Release or covenant not to sue.

When a release or a covenant
not to sue or not to enforce judgment is given in good faith to one
(1) of two (2) or more persons liable in tort for the same injury
or the same wrongful death, it does not discharge any of the other
tortfeasors from liability for the injury or wrongful death unless
its terms so provide.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 137, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former § 1-1-113 related to the same subject matter as this section, before being repealed in 1986. See, also, §

1-1-109

and notes thereto.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Release of one joint tortfeasor as discharging liability of others under uniform contribution among tortfeasors act and other statutes expressly governing effect of release, 6 ALR5th 883.

Validity and effect of “Mary Carter” or similar agreement setting maximum liability of one cotortfeasor and providing for reduction or extinguishment thereof relative to recovery against nonagreeing cotortfeasor, 22 ALR5th 483.

§ 1-1-120.
Persons
rendering emergency assistance exempt from civil liability.

Any person licensed as a physician and surgeon under the laws of the state of Wyoming, or any other person, who in good faith renders emergency care or assistance without compensation at the place of an emergency or accident, is not liable for any civil damages for acts or omissions in good faith.

Persons or organizations operating volunteer ambulances or rescue vehicles supported by public or private funds, staffed by unpaid volunteers, and which make no charge, or charge an incidental service or user fee, for services rendered during medical emergencies, and the unpaid volunteers who staff ambulances and rescue vehicles are not liable for any civil damages for acts or omissions in good faith in furnishing emergency medical services. This immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. For purposes of this section, “unpaid volunteers” means persons who either receive incidental remuneration on a per call basis or receive no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) annually for volunteer ambulance and rescue activities. The immunity provided by this subsection shall extend to a physician while serving in his capacity as medical director of any ambulance service, to hospitals and hospital employees for activities directly related to providing clinical training as part of an emergency medical service class approved by the department of health, and to students while participating in emergency medical services training approved by the department of health. If an unpaid volunteer’s, medical director’s, hospital’s or trainee’s acts or omissions are subject to the provisions of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, immunity under this section is waived to the extent of the maximum liability provided under W.S.

1-39-118

.

Any person who provides assistance or advice without compensation other than reimbursement of out-of-pocket expenses in mitigating or attempting to mitigate the effects of an actual or threatened discharge of hazardous materials, or in preventing, cleaning up or disposing of or in attempting to prevent, clean up or dispose of any discharge of hazardous materials, is not liable for any civil damages for acts or omissions in good faith in providing the assistance or advice. This immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. As used in this subsection:

“Discharge” includes leakage, seepage or other release;

“Hazardous materials” includes all materials and substances which are now or hereafter designated or defined as hazardous by any state or federal law or by the regulations of any state or federal government agency.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 42, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-343.1; Laws 1977, ch. 135, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-143; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

1-1-119

; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 2; ch. 229, § 1; 2003, ch. 113, § 1; 2005, ch. 112, § 1.

Cross references. —

For the Wyoming Emergency Medical Services Act, see chapter 36 of title 33.

The 2005 amendment

in (b), inserted the fourth sentence, and in the last sentence added “medical director's, hospital's or trainee's” after “If an unpaid volunteer’s.”

Laws 2005, ch. 112, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 2, effective May 22, 1987, renumbered former § 33-26-143 as §

1-1-119

, effective May 22, 1987. Since Laws 1987, ch. 137, § 1, also added a §

1-1-119

, this section has been renumbered as §

1-1-120

.

Wyoming Governmental Claims Act. —

See §§

1-39-101

, 1-39-103(a)(viii).

Care or assistance must be rendered “without compensation.”
—

It will be noted the legislature has here recognized the right of a doctor or other person to have immunity when he renders emergency care or assistance in good faith, only if it is rendered “without compensation.” Lutheran Hosps. & Homes Soc'y of Am. v. Yepsen, 469 P.2d 409,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1970).

Quoted

in

Ellsworth Bros. v. Crook, 406 P.2d 520,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1965).

Cited

in

Danculovich v. Brown, 593 P.2d 187,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

For case note on Lutheran Hosps. & Homes Soc'y of America v. Yepsen, 469 P.2d 409,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1970), see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 717 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction of “good Samaritan” statute excusing from civil liability one rendering care in emergency, 39 ALR3d 222.

Liability of otherwise uninvolved person for harm resulting from refusal to telephone, or to allow another to telephone, for emergency or police help, 37 ALR4th 1196.

Liability of operator of ambulance service for personal injuries to person being transported, 68 ALR4th 14.

Construction and application of “good samaritan” statutes, 68 ALR4th 294.

Rescue doctrine: liability of one who negligently causes motor vehicle accident for injuries to person subsequently attempting to rescue persons or property, 73 ALR4th 737.

Application of “firemen's rule” to bar recovery by emergency medical personnel injured in responding to, or at scene of, emergency, 89 ALR4th 1079.

Duty of retail establishment, or its employees, to assist patron choking on food, 2 ALR5th 966.

Infliction of emotional distress: toxic exposure, 6 ALR5th 162.

Modern status of sudden emergency doctrine, 10 ALR5th 680.

Common-law strict liability in tort of prior landowner or lessee to subsequent owner for contamination of land with hazardous waste resulting from prior owner's or lessee's abnormally dangerous or ultrahazardous activity, 13 ALR5th 600.

Liability for negligence of ambulance attendants, emergency medical technicians and the like, rendering emergency medical care outside hospital, 16 ALR5th 605.

Valuing damages in personal injury actions awarded for gratuitously rendered nursing and medical care, 49 ALR5th 685.

What constitutes “hazardous waste” subject to regulation under Resource Conservation and Recovery Act USCS §§ 6901 et seq.)?, 135 ALR Fed 197.

§ 1-1-121.
Recreation Safety Act; short title.

This act shall be known
and may be cited as the “Recreation Safety Act”.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 228, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1989, ch. 262, § 1, also enacted a §

1-1-121

, but it was renumbered as §

1-1-124

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-1-122(a)(vi).

Nature of risk. —

Whether the risk of being thrown was an inherent risk of riding a mule, in light of proffered evidence that the mule in question was likely to throw a rider, was a question of fact. Walters v. Grand Teton Crest Outfitters, Inc., 804 F. Supp. 1442, 1992 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 15892 (D. Wyo. 1992).

Duty to provide instruction. —

Once a skier asked a resort employee how to exit the advanced terrain park area without “taking” any of the features, the resort had a duty to provide her with appropriate instructions, which might have included a specific warning to beware of the drop into the half-pipe at the end of the catwalk that provided an exit out of the terrain park area, and the trial court erred when it found that the risk of falling into the half-pipe was an inherent risk of the skier's alpine skiing and that therefore the resort did not owe her a duty under the Recreation Safety Act. Dunbar v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort Corp., 392 F.3d 1145, 2004 U.S. App. LEXIS 25807 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2004).

Application to ski lifts. —

In answer to two certified questions, the Supreme Court of Wyoming held that Wyoming's Recreational Safety Act (RSA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-1-121

et seq., does not apply to a cause of action based upon the design or manufacture of sport or recreational equipment or products or safety equipment used incidental to or required by the sport or recreational opportunity. That exemption does not exclude the operation of a ski lift by a recreational provider from the protections of the RSA.
Muller v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort, 2006 WY 100, 139 P.3d 1162,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 2006).

Inherent risk. —

Wyoming Recreational Safety Act (RSA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-1-121

et seq., is, in part, a products liability statute that is unambiguous on its face and the RSA does not necessarily exclude a ski lift from its protections. The inherent risks of skiing are not limited only to the act of skiing, and an injury suffered while boarding a ski lift (with skis stowed on the exterior of the lift) may be an inherent risk of skiing.
Muller v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort, 2006 WY 100, 139 P.3d 1162,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 2006).

Finding that the horse rider's injuries were the result of an inherent risk of horseback riding as defined by the Wyoming Recreation Safety Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-1-121

to

1-1-123

, was proper because the legislature defined the term “inherent risk” in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-1-122(a)(i)and the district court did not err in declining to further define the legislature's language. The district court properly instructed the jury and provided an appropriate form of special verdict for the jury's use.
Beckwith v. Weber, 2012 WY 62, 277 P.3d 713,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2012).

Cited

in

Peterson v. Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n, 989 P.2d 113,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 1-1-122.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Inherent risk” with regard to any sport or recreational opportunity means those dangers or conditions which are characteristic of, intrinsic to, or an integral part of any sport or recreational opportunity;

“Provider” means any person or governmental entity which for profit or otherwise, offers or conducts a sport or recreational opportunity or regulates an interscholastic sport or recreational opportunity. This act does not apply to a cause of action based upon the design or manufacture of sport or recreational equipment or products or safety equipment used incidental to or required by the sport or recreational opportunity;

“Sport or recreational opportunity” means commonly understood sporting activities including baseball, softball, football, soccer, basketball, swimming, hockey, wrestling, cheerleading, rodeo, dude ranching, nordic or alpine skiing and other alpine sports, snowboarding, mountain climbing, outdoor education programs, river floating, hunting, fishing, backcountry trips, horseback riding and any other equine activity, snowmobiling and similar recreational opportunities and includes the use of private lands for vehicle parking and land access related to the sport or recreational opportunity. “Sport or recreational opportunity” does not include skiing in a ski area as defined by the Ski Safety Act;

“Equine activity” means:

Equine shows, fairs, competitions, performances or parades that involve any or all breeds of equines;

Any of the equine disciplines;

Equine training or teaching activities, or both;

Boarding equines;

Riding, inspecting or evaluating an equine belonging to another, whether or not the owner has received some monetary consideration or other thing of value for the use of the equine or is permitting a prospective purchaser of the equine to ride, inspect or evaluate the equine;

Rides, trips, hunts or other equine activities of any type however informal or impromptu;

Day use rental riding, riding associated with a dude ranch or riding associated with outfitted pack trips; and

Placing or replacing horseshoes on an equine.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 78, § 2.

“This act” means W.S.

1-1-121

through

1-1-123

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 228, § 1; 1993, ch. 162, § 1; 1996, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 47, § 1; 2011, ch. 91, § 1; 2015 ch. 178, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “and includes the use of private lands for vehicle parking and land access related to the sport or recreational opportunity” in (a)(iii).

The 2011 amendment,

in (a)(iii), substituted “and other alpine sports, snowboarding, mountain climbing, outdoor education programs” for “mountain climbing.”.

Laws 2011, ch. 91, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added the last sentence of (a)(iii) and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

“Inherent risk.” —

River rafting operator failed to produce any admissible evidence that bumping heads with another passenger was an inherent risk in river rafting, and therefore operator was not entitled to summary judgment under Recreation Safety Act. Madsen v. Wyoming River Trips, Inc., 31 F. Supp. 2d 1321, 1999 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 77 (D. Wyo. 1999).

What an “inherent risk” means in any given set of circumstances is a variable that the Wyoming Legislature included in the Wyoming Recreational Safety Act (RSA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-1-121

et seq., by design.
Muller v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort, 2006 WY 100, 139 P.3d 1162,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 2006).

Finding that the horse rider's injuries were the result of an inherent risk of horseback riding as defined by the Wyoming Recreation Safety Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-1-121

to

1-1-123

, was proper because the legislature defined the term “inherent risk” in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-1-122(a)(i)and the district court did not err in declining to further define the legislature's language. The district court properly instructed the jury and provided an appropriate form of special verdict for the jury's use.
Beckwith v. Weber, 2012 WY 62, 277 P.3d 713,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2012).

Wyoming Recreation Safety Act (WRSA)-- which does not exempt or identify specific inherent risks--did not conflict with the types of risks or injuries listed in a release signed by the plaintiff when she rented ski equipment; the release at issue did not incorporate by reference the WRSA. Cunningham v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort Corp., 673 Fed. Appx. 841, 2016 U.S. App. LEXIS 22608 (10th Cir. 2016), cert. denied, 137 S. Ct. 2270, 198 L. Ed. 2d 714, 2017 U.S. LEXIS 3994 (U.S. 2017).

If a motion for summary judgment is filed, a trial court must scrutinize the facts brought forward by the parties with great care, and if the court can say that, given that evidence, this is an “inherent risk” of a recreational activity under this section and the guidance of Colo. Rev. Stat. Ann. §

33-44-103

(3.5), N.M. Stat. Ann. § 24-15-10, and Utah Code Ann. § 78-27-52 with regards to skiing and reasonable minds cannot differ about that, then summary judgment is appropriate. If the risk is an inherent one, then the provider has no duty to eliminate, alter, or control it; however, if reasonable minds could differ as to whether or not the risk was one inherent to the recreational activity, then summary judgment is not appropriate and the answer to the question must be assigned to the jury (or other fact finder). Jackson Hole Mt. Resort Corp. v. Rohrman, 2006 WY 156, 150 P.3d 167,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2006).

District court did not err by granting the ski resort summary judgment under the Wyoming Recreation Safety Act (WRSA) in the skier’s negligence lawsuit because the skier’s injury, which was caused when he skied into an unmarked six-and-a-half foot tree on an off-piste run that was submerged and made invisible by a recent heavy snowfall, was an inherent risk of skiing for which the WRSA precluded liability. Standish v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort Corp., 997 F.3d 1095, 2021 U.S. App. LEXIS 14338 (10th Cir. 2021).

Equine activity injuries. —

Although the Wyoming Recreation Safety Act's definition of an equine activity extends to injuries received while evaluating the horse in contemplation of a sale, it plainly does not extend to a breach of warranty action arising from the sale. Keller v. Merrick, 955 P.2d 876,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1998).

Company that provided guided horseback rides in a wilderness area of a national park was entitled to summary judgment on a negligence claim by the estate of a horseback rider because any risks associated with spooked, runaway horses, including the rider’s fall from the horse, were inherent in the activity of horseback riding, and, pursuant to the Wyoming Recreation Safety Act, the company owed no duty to protect the rider from the inherent risks of horseback riding. Dullmaier v. Xanterra Parks & Resorts, 883 F.3d 1278, 2018 U.S. App. LEXIS 4792 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2018).

Wyoming Recreation Safety Act does not establish public policy creating a public duty for equine providers. Street v. Darwin Ranch, Inc., 75 F. Supp. 2d 1296, 1999 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17646 (D. Wyo. 1999).

Slipping saddle due to loose cinch was an inherent risk of horseback riding under Wyoming Recreation Safety Act, and therefore horse provider had no duty to protect customers against it. Cooperman v. David, 214 F.3d 1162, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 11925 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2000).

Because horseback
riding is considered a sport or recreational opportunity under this
section, a provider was not required to eliminate, alter, or control
the inherent risks associated with horseback riding, and any person
who chose to take part in the provider's horseback riding services
assumed all inherent risks which were associated with that activity.
As a result, a rider could not sue the provider for negligence if
the damage, injury or death alleged in her complaint was the result
of an inherent risk of horseback riding. Kovnat v. Xanterra Parks & Resorts, 770 F.3d 949, 2014 U.S. App. LEXIS 20140 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2014).

Application to Ski Lifts. —

Wyoming Recreational Safety Act (RSA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-1-121

et seq., is, in part, a products liability statute that is unambiguous on its face and the RSA does not necessarily exclude a ski lift from its protections. The inherent risks of skiing are not limited only to the act of skiing, and an injury suffered while boarding a ski lift (with skis stowed on the exterior of the lift) may be an inherent risk of skiing.
Muller v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort, 2006 WY 100, 139 P.3d 1162,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 2006).

Application to golf. —

Genuine questions of material fact existed as to whether the operator of a golf course increased the risk that a spectator would be struck by a golf ball, beyond the risk inherent in the sport, when the course's agent instructed a player to tee off when golfers and spectators were on and around the green and the player expressed concern that he could hit the group ahead of him.
Creel v. L & L, 2012 WY 124, 287 P.3d 729,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2012).

Quoted

in

Carden v. Kelly, 175 F. Supp. 2d 1318, 2001 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 20055 (D. Wyo. 2001); Dunbar v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort Corp., 392 F.3d 1145,

2004 U.S. App. LEXIS 25807

(2004); Halvorson v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2015 WY 18,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Feb. 4, 2015).

Stated

in

Halpern v. Wheeldon, 890 P.2d 562,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Estate of Harshman v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort Corp., 200 F. Supp. 2d 1329, 2002 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7946 (D. Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Recreational Injuries and Inherent Risks: Wyoming's Recreation Safety Act: An Update,” see XXXIII Land & Water L. Rev. 249 (1998).